klingon-noun.lexc
! REFERENCES
! https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Klingon_grammar
! https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=e5Did-eVQDc

Multichar_Symbols [1P] [2P] [3P] [SG] [PL] [AUGMENTATIVE] [DIMINUTIVE] [ENDEARMENT] [PL-LANGUSER] [PL-BODYPART] [PL-OTHERNOUN] [SOCALLED] [DUBITATIVE] [ACCURATE] [THIS] [THAT] [LOCATIVE] [ABLATIVE] [CAUSAL] [DATIVE] [TOPIC] [ALL-OVER-THE-PLACE] @D.NOUNTYPE1.ON@ @P.NOUNTYPE1.ON@ @D.NOUNTYPE2.ON@ @P.NOUNTYPE2.ON@ @D.NOUNTYPE3.ON@ @P.NOUNTYPE3.ON@ @D.NOUNTYPE4.ON@ @P.NOUNTYPE4.ON@ @D.NOUNTYPE5.ON@ @P.NOUNTYPE5.ON@ @U.NOUNTYPE.BODYPART@ @U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@ @U.NOUNTYPE.OTHER@

LEXICON Root
						Pronoun;
@U.NOUNTYPE.BODYPART@				NounBodyPart;
@U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@			NounCapableOfLanguage;
@U.NOUNTYPE.OTHER@				NounOther;


LEXICON Pronoun
bIH%[they,them%]@U.NOUNTYPE.OTHER@:bIH@U.NOUNTYPE.OTHER@				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
chaH%[they,them%]@U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@:chaH@U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@	AllNounTypeSuffixes;
'e'%[that%]:'e'					AllNounTypeSuffixes; ! Referring to previous part of sentence
ghaH%[he,she,him,her%]:ghaH			AllNounTypeSuffixes;
jIH%[I,me%]:jIH					AllNounTypeSuffixes;
maH%[we,us%]:maH				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
net%[that,also%]:net				AllNounTypeSuffixes; ! Similar to 'e'
'oH%[it%]:'oH					AllNounTypeSuffixes;
SoH%[you-SG%]:SoH				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
tlhIH%[you-PL%]:tlhIH				AllNounTypeSuffixes;


LEXICON NounBodyPart
mIn%[eye%]:mIn					AllNounTypeSuffixes;
ghop%[hand%]:ghop				AllNounTypeSuffixes;


LEXICON NounCapableOfLanguage
qeSwI'pu'%[advisor%]:qeSwI'pu'			AllNounTypeSuffixes;
je'wI'%[buyer%]:je'wI'				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
puq%[child%]:puq				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
vav%[father%]:vav				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
jup%[friend%]:jup				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
loD%[man%]:loD					AllNounTypeSuffixes;
ghot%[person]:ghot				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
qetwI'%[runner%]:qetwI'			AllNounTypeSuffixes;
be'%[woman%]:be'				AllNounTypeSuffixes;


LEXICON NounOther
quS%[chair%]:quS				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
choH%[change%]:choH				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
veng%[city%]:veng				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
qoj%[cliff%]:qoj				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
wep%[coat%]:wep					AllNounTypeSuffixes;
Soj%[food%]:Soj					AllNounTypeSuffixes;
ghom%[group%]:ghom				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
QaH%[help%]:QaH					AllNounTypeSuffixes;
juH%[house%]:juH				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
qach%[idea%]:qach				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
nav%[paper%]:nav				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
Saj%[pet%]:Saj					AllNounTypeSuffixes;
yuQ%[planet%]:yuQ				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
pa'%[room%]:pa'					AllNounTypeSuffixes;
ghu'%[situation%]:ghu'				AllNounTypeSuffixes;
Hov%[star%]:Hov					AllNounTypeSuffixes;
Duj%[ship%]:Duj					AllNounTypeSuffixes;
targh%[targ%]:targh				AllNounTypeSuffixes; ! A "targ" is a Klingon animal somewhat resembling a boar
cha%[torpedo%]:cha				AllNounTypeSuffixes;


LEXICON AllNounTypeSuffixes
			NounType1Gate;
@P.NOUNTYPE1.ON@			NounType2Gate;
@P.NOUNTYPE1.ON@@P.NOUNTYPE2.ON@		NounType3Gate;
@P.NOUNTYPE1.ON@@P.NOUNTYPE2.ON@@P.NOUNTYPE3.ON@		NounType4Gate;
@P.NOUNTYPE1.ON@@P.NOUNTYPE2.ON@@P.NOUNTYPE3.ON@@P.NOUNTYPE4.ON@		NounType5Gate;
						#;


LEXICON NounType1Gate
@D.NOUNTYPE1.ON@@P.NOUNTYPE1.ON@		NounType1Suffix;

LEXICON NounType1Suffix ! size, affection
[AUGMENTATIVE]:'a'				NounTypeSuffix;
[DIMINUTIVE]:Hom				NounTypeSuffix;
[ENDEARMENT]:oy					NounTypeSuffix;


LEXICON NounType2Gate
@D.NOUNTYPE2.ON@@P.NOUNTYPE2.ON@		NounType2Suffix;

! A noun does not require a plural suffix if a pronoun or pronominal prefix serves to indicate that it is plural,[10] or if it is being used in conjunction with a number.
LEXICON NounType2Suffix ! plurals
[PL]@U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@:pu'@U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@		NounTypeSuffix;
[PL]@U.NOUNTYPE.BODYPART@:Du'@U.NOUNTYPE.BODYPART@				NounTypeSuffix;
[PL]@U.NOUNTYPE.OTHER@:@U.NOUNTYPE.OTHER@mey					NounTypeSuffix;
[ALL-OVER-THE-PLACE]@U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@:@U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@mey	NounTypeSuffix; ! When -mey is used for nouns that would normally take -pu’ or -Du’, it carries the connotation of being all over the place.
[ALL-OVER-THE-PLACE]@U.NOUNTYPE.BODYPART@:@U.NOUNTYPE.BODYPART@mey			NounTypeSuffix; ! When -mey is used for nouns that would normally take -pu’ or -Du’, it carries the connotation of being all over the place.
[PL]						NounTypeSuffix; ! A plural suffix is never obligatory

LEXICON NounType3Gate
@D.NOUNTYPE3.ON@@P.NOUNTYPE3.ON@		NounType3Suffix;

LEXICON NounType3Suffix ! accuracy
[SOCALLED]:qoq					NounTypeSuffix;
[DUBITATIVE]:Hey				NounTypeSuffix;
[ACCURATE]:na'					NounTypeSuffix;


LEXICON NounType4Gate
@D.NOUNTYPE4.ON@@P.NOUNTYPE4.ON@		NounType4Suffix;

LEXICON NounType4Suffix ! possession, determiners
[1P][SG]:wIj					NounTypeSuffix;
[1P][SG]@U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@:wI'@U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@				NounTypeSuffix;
[2P][SG]:lIj					NounTypeSuffix;
[2P][SG]@U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@:lI'@U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@				NounTypeSuffix;
[3P][SG]:Daj					NounTypeSuffix;
[1P][PL]:maj					NounTypeSuffix;
[1P][PL]@U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@:ma'@U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@				NounTypeSuffix;
[2P][PL]:raj					NounTypeSuffix;
[2P][PL]@U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@:ra'@U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@				NounTypeSuffix;
[3P][PL]:chaj					NounTypeSuffix;
[THIS]:vam					NounTypeSuffix;
[THAT]:vetlh					NounTypeSuffix;


LEXICON NounType5Gate
@D.NOUNTYPE5.ON@@P.NOUNTYPE5.ON@		NounType5Suffix;

LEXICON NounType5Suffix ! syntactic role
[LOCATIVE]:Daq					#;
[ABLATIVE]:vo'					#;
[CAUSAL]:mo'					#;
[DATIVE]:vaD					#;
[TOPIC]:'e'					#;
